Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4090.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. ORS 801.041 is amended to read:
801.041. The following apply to the authority granted to counties by ORS 801.040 to establish
registration fees for vehicles:
(1) An ordinance establishing registration fees under this section must be enacted by the county
imposing the registration fee and filed with the Department of Transportation. Notwithstanding
ORS 203.055 or any provision of a county charter, the governing body of a county with a population
of 350,000 or more may enact an ordinance establishing registration fees. The governing body of a
county with a population of less than 350,000 may enact an ordinance establishing registration fees
after submitting the ordinance to the electors of the county for their approval. The governing body
of the county imposing the registration fee shall enter into an intergovernmental agreement under
ORS 190.010 with the department by which the department shall collect the registration fees, pay
them over to the county and, if necessary, allow the credit or credits described in ORS 803.445 (5).
The intergovernmental agreement must state the date on which the department shall begin collect-
ing registration fees for the county.
(2) The authority granted by this section allows the establishment of registration fees in addition
to those described in ORS 803.420 and 803.422. There is no authority under this section to affect
registration periods, qualifications, cards, plates, requirements or any other provision relating to
vehicle registration under the vehicle code.
(3) Except as otherwise provided for in this subsection, when registration fees are imposed under
this section, they must be imposed on all vehicle classes. Registration fees as provided under this
NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 196

HB 4090
section may not be imposed on the following:
(a) Snowmobiles and Class I all-terrain vehicles.
(b) Fixed load vehicles.
(c) Vehicles registered under ORS 805.100 to disabled veterans.
(d) Vehicles registered as antique vehicles under ORS 805.010.
(e) Vehicles registered as vehicles of special interest under ORS 805.020.
(f) Government-owned or operated vehicles registered under ORS 805.040 or 805.045.
(g) School buses or school activity vehicles registered under ORS 805.050.
(h) Law enforcement undercover vehicles registered under ORS 805.060.
(i) Vehicles registered on a proportional basis for interstate operation.
(j) Vehicles with a registration weight of 26,001 pounds or more described in ORS 803.420 (14)(a)
or (b).
(k) Vehicles registered as farm vehicles under the provisions of ORS 805.300.
(L) Travel trailers, campers and motor homes.
(m) Vehicles registered to an employment address as provided in ORS 802.250 when the eligible
public employee or household member’s residence address is not within the county of the employ-
ment address. The department may adopt rules it considers necessary for the administration of this
paragraph.
(n) Vehicles registered under ORS 805.110 to former prisoners of war.
(4) Any registration fee imposed by a county must be a fixed amount not to exceed, with respect
to any vehicle class, the sum of the registration fee established under ORS 803.420 (6)(a) and the fee
applicable to the registered vehicle under ORS 803.422. For vehicles on which a flat fee is imposed
under ORS 803.420, the fee must be a whole dollar amount.
(5) Moneys from registration fees established under this section must be paid to the county es-
tablishing the registration fees as provided in ORS 802.110.
(6) Except as provided in subsection (9) or (11) of this section or ORS 801.044, or unless a
different distribution is agreed upon by the county and the cities within the jurisdiction of the
county, the county ordinance shall provide for payment of at least 40 percent of the moneys from
registration fees established under this section to cities within the county.
(7) The moneys for the cities and the county shall be used for any purpose for which moneys
from registration fees may be used, including the payment of debt service and costs related to bonds
or other obligations issued for such purposes.
(8) Two or more counties may act jointly to impose a registration fee under this section. The
ordinance of each county acting jointly with another under this subsection must provide for the
distribution of moneys collected through a joint registration fee.
(9) A county that has a population of 700,000 or more and that imposes a county regis-
tration fee under this section:
(a) May by ordinance identify one or more zones within the county that have median
household income that the Department of Transportation estimates is less than
$ ;
(b) Shall establish in the ordinance described in paragraph (a) of this subsection the
boundaries of each zone, so that a zone consists of a clearly identified coterminous area; and
(c) Shall include in the ordinance the amount that the registration fee otherwise imposed
under this section is reduced, or a provision that the registration fee otherwise imposed
under this section is eliminated, for registrations occurring on or after the effective date of
[2]

HB 4090
the ordinance.
(10) The Department of Transportation, in consultation with the Department of Revenue,
shall adopt rules for determining estimates of median household income for purposes of es-
tablishing zones described in subsection (9) of this section.
(11)(a) A county that has a population of 700,000 or more and that imposes a county
registration fee under this section may develop and publish a regional allocation plan that:
(A) Defines a share of registration fee revenues from the registration fee imposed under
this section that are to be further allocated as described in this subsection;
(B) Designates sub-areas within the county for which special allocation under this sub-
section is to occur, including the boundaries of each designated coterminous sub-area es-
tablished in a regional allocation plan; and
(C) Identifies particular projects that are consistent with Article IX, section 3a, of the
Oregon Constitution, and that benefit one or more sub-areas designated under subparagraph
(B) of this paragraph in the regional allocation plan.
(b) The Department of Transportation may adopt rules to implement this subsection,
including rules establishing a process for determining share allocations and sub-area desig-
nation under this subsection.
(c) A county may enter into a memorandum of understanding with any city, district or
other government entity to implement a regional allocation plan developed under this sub-
section.
(12) Each county that adopts a registration fee reduction or elimination ordinance under
subsection (9) of this section and each county that adopts a regional allocation plan under
subsection (11) of this section shall:
(a) Immediately after adoption, provide a copy of the ordinance or plan to the Depart-
ment of Transportation and the Department of Revenue;
(b) Undertake coordination efforts with the departments to enable implementation of
adopted ordinances or plans, including but not limited to data-sharing and providing input
on agency rulemaking efforts, except that any data-sharing must also comply with Depart-
ment of Revenue confidentiality requirements; and
(c) Annually provide a written report to affected cities and to the Legislative Assembly,
in the manner prescribed in ORS 192.245, that sets forth:
(A) In the case of an ordinance adopted under subsection (9) of this section, the amount
of registration fee revenue foregone in the preceding year; and
(B) In the case of a regional allocation plan adopted under subsection (11) of this section,
the amount of revenue raised in the preceding year that is subject to allocation pursuant to
the regional allocation plan and a summary of the allocations made and projects funded un-
der the plan during the preceding year.
SECTION 2. ORS 801.041, as amended by section 50, chapter 1, Oregon Laws 2025 (special
session), is amended to read:
801.041. The following apply to the authority granted to counties by ORS 801.040 to establish
registration fees for vehicles:
(1) An ordinance establishing registration fees under this section must be enacted by the county
imposing the registration fee and filed with the Department of Transportation. Notwithstanding
ORS 203.055 or any provision of a county charter, the governing body of a county with a population
of 350,000 or more may enact an ordinance establishing registration fees. The governing body of a
[3]

HB 4090
county with a population of less than 350,000 may enact an ordinance establishing registration fees
after submitting the ordinance to the electors of the county for their approval. The governing body
of the county imposing the registration fee shall enter into an intergovernmental agreement under
ORS 190.010 with the department by which the department shall collect the registration fees, pay
them over to the county and, if necessary, allow the credit or credits described in ORS 803.445 (5).
The intergovernmental agreement must state the date on which the department shall begin collect-
ing registration fees for the county.
(2) The authority granted by this section allows the establishment of registration fees in addition
to those described in ORS 803.420 and 803.422. There is no authority under this section to affect
registration periods, qualifications, cards, plates, requirements or any other provision relating to
vehicle registration under the vehicle code.
(3) Except as otherwise provided for in this subsection, when registration fees are imposed under
this section, they must be imposed on all vehicle classes. Registration fees as provided under this
section may not be imposed on the following:
(a) Snowmobiles and Class I all-terrain vehicles.
(b) Fixed load vehicles.
(c) Vehicles registered under ORS 805.100 to disabled veterans.
(d) Vehicles registered as antique vehicles under ORS 805.010.
(e) Vehicles registered as vehicles of special interest under ORS 805.020.
(f) Government-owned or operated vehicles registered under ORS 805.040 or 805.045.
(g) School buses or school activity vehicles registered under ORS 805.050.
(h) Law enforcement undercover vehicles registered under ORS 805.060.
(i) Vehicles registered on a proportional basis for interstate operation.
(j) Vehicles with a registration weight of 26,001 pounds or more described in ORS 803.420 (14)(a)
or (b).
(k) Vehicles registered as farm vehicles under the provisions of ORS 805.300.
(L) Travel trailers, campers and motor homes.
(m) Vehicles registered to an employment address as provided in ORS 802.250 when the eligible
public employee or household member’s residence address is not within the county of the employ-
ment address. The department may adopt rules it considers necessary for the administration of this
paragraph.
(n) Vehicles registered under ORS 805.110 to former prisoners of war.
(4)(a) Any registration fee imposed by a county must be a fixed amount not to exceed, with re-
spect to any vehicle class, the sum of the registration fee established under ORS 803.420 (6)(a) and
the fee applicable to the registered vehicle under ORS 803.422. For vehicles on which a flat fee is
imposed under ORS 803.420, the fee must be a whole dollar amount.
(b) A subject vehicle exempt under ORS 319.885 from the fees imposed under ORS 803.422 shall
remain liable for any amount of vehicle registration fee imposed by a county under this section that
would be required if the exemption did not exist. As used in this subsection, “subject vehicle” has
the meaning given that term in ORS 319.883.
(5) Moneys from registration fees established under this section must be paid to the county es-
tablishing the registration fees as provided in ORS 802.110.
(6) Except as provided in subsection (9) or (11) of this section or ORS 801.044, or unless a
different distribution is agreed upon by the county and the cities within the jurisdiction of the
county, the county ordinance shall provide for payment of at least 40 percent of the moneys from
[4]

HB 4090
registration fees established under this section to cities within the county.
(7) The moneys for the cities and the county shall be used for any purpose for which moneys
from registration fees may be used, including the payment of debt service and costs related to bonds
or other obligations issued for such purposes.
(8) Two or more counties may act jointly to impose a registration fee under this section. The
ordinance of each county acting jointly with another under this subsection must provide for the
distribution of moneys collected through a joint registration fee.
(9) A county that has a population of 700,000 or more and that imposes a county regis-
tration fee under this section:
(a) May by ordinance identify one or more zones within the county that have median
household income that the Department of Transportation estimates is less than
$ ;
(b) Shall establish in the ordinance described in paragraph (a) of this subsection the
boundaries of each zone, so that a zone consists of a clearly identified coterminous area; and
(c) Shall include in the ordinance the amount that the registration fee otherwise imposed
under this section is reduced, or a provision that the registration fee otherwise imposed
under this section is eliminated, for registrations occurring on or after the effective date of
the ordinance.
(10) The Department of Transportation, in consultation with the Department of Revenue,
shall adopt rules for determining estimates of median household income for purposes of es-
tablishing zones described in subsection (9) of this section.
(11)(a) A county that has a population of 700,000 or more and that imposes a county
registration fee under this section may develop and publish a regional allocation plan that:
(A) Defines a share of registration fee revenues from the registration fee imposed under
this section that are to be further allocated as described in this subsection;
(B) Designates sub-areas within the county for which special allocation under this sub-
section is to occur, including the boundaries of each designated coterminous sub-area es-
tablished in a regional allocation plan; and
(C) Identifies particular projects that are consistent with Article IX, section 3a, of the
Oregon Constitution, and that benefit one or more sub-areas designated under subparagraph
(B) of this paragraph in the regional allocation plan.
(b) The Department of Transportation may adopt rules to implement this subsection,
including rules establishing a process for determining share allocations and sub-area desig-
nation under this subsection.
(c) A county may enter into a memorandum of understanding with any city, district or
other government entity to implement a regional allocation plan developed under this sub-
section.
(12) Each county that adopts a registration fee reduction or elimination ordinance under
subsection (9) of this section and each county that adopts a regional allocation plan under
subsection (11) of this section shall:
(a) Immediately after adoption, provide a copy of the ordinance or plan to the Depart-
ment of Transportation and the Department of Revenue;
(b) Undertake coordination efforts with the departments to enable implementation of
adopted ordinances or plans, including but not limited to data-sharing and providing input
on agency rulemaking efforts, except that any data-sharing must also comply with Depart-
[5]

HB 4090
ment of Revenue confidentiality requirements; and
(c) Annually provide a written report to affected cities and to the Legislative Assembly,
in the manner prescribed in ORS 192.245, that sets forth:
(A) In the case of an ordinance adopted under subsection (9) of this section, the amount
of registration fee revenue foregone in the preceding year; and
(B) In the case of a regional allocation plan adopted under subsection (11) of this section,
the amount of revenue raised in the preceding year that is subject to allocation pursuant to
the regional allocation plan and a summary of the allocations made and projects funded un-
der the plan during the preceding year.
SECTION 3. ORS 801.044 is amended to read:
801.044. (1) A county ordinance that imposes a vehicle registration fee under ORS 801.041 is not
required to provide for payment of at least 40 percent of moneys from the registration fee to cities
within the county if the county:
(a) Has a population of 650,000 or more; and
(b) Uses the moneys from the registration fee to pay for performing capital maintenance on,
planning, designing, replacing, acquiring necessary property for, engineering, constructing or re-
pairing a bridge that crosses the Willamette River in the City of Portland, or the approaches to the
bridge, including the payment of debt service and costs related to bonds or other obligations issued
for such purposes.
(2) This section applies to county vehicle registration fees that are imposed for the purpose of
performing capital maintenance on, planning, designing, replacing, acquiring necessary property for,
engineering, constructing or repairing a bridge that crosses the Willamette River in the City of
Portland, or the approaches to the bridge, including the payment of debt service and costs related
to bonds or other obligations issued for such purposes.
(3) A county that is otherwise described in this section and that qualifies for adopting a
reduction or elimination ordinance under ORS 801.041 (9) or a regional allocation plan under
ORS 801.041 (11) may distribute remaining county registration fee revenues as prescribed in
this section after taking into account applicable changes made pursuant to ORS 801.041 (9)
or (11).
SECTION 4. This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.

[6]